Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,210
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-5,210 to 81-5,243 shall be known and may be cited as the Conveyance Safety Act.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 26;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2501;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 46.